Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.320.191

Program of early learning under RCW 43.216.555.

For the program of early learning established in RCW 43.216.555, school districts:

(1) Shall work cooperatively with program providers to coordinate the transition from preschool to kindergarten so that children and their families are well-prepared and supported; and

(2) May contract with the department of children, youth, and families to deliver services under the program.

[ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 219; 2010 c 231 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 ss 102, 104-115, 201-227, 301-337, 401-419, 501-513, 801-803, and 805-822: See note following RCW 43.216.025.

Conflict with federal requirements—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6: See RCW 43.216.908.